Utah statutes.
53B-23-102.   Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Instructional material or materials" means textbooks and other
materials written and published primarily for use by students in postsecondary
instruction that are required or essential to a student's success in a course
of study in which a student with a disability is enrolled.  The determination
of which materials are "required or essential to student success" shall be
made by the instructor of the course in consultation with the official making
the request pursuant to Section 53B-23-103 in accordance with rules issued
pursuant to Section 53B-23-106.
(b)  "Instructional material or materials" does not include nontextual
mathematics and science materials until the time software becomes commercially
available that permits the conversion of existing electronic files of the
materials into a format that is compatible with braille translation software
or alternative media for students with disabilities.
(2)  "Printed instructional material or materials" means instructional
material or materials in book or other printed form.
(3)  "Nonprinted instructional materials" means instructional materials in
formats other than print, and includes instructional materials that require
the availability of electronic equipment in order to be used as a learning
resource, including software programs, video disks, and video and audio tapes.
(4)  "State institution of higher education" means an institution listed in
Section 53B-2-101.
(5)  "Specialized format" means braille, audio, or digital text that is
exclusively for use by blind or other persons with disabilities.
(6) (a)  "Structural integrity" means all of the printed instructional
material, including the text of the material, sidebars, the table of contents,
chapter headings and subheadings, footnotes, indexes, glossaries, and
bibliographies.
(b)  "Structural integrity" need not include nontextual elements such as
pictures, illustrations, graphs, or charts.
